Utah statutes.
77-18-8.   Fine not paid -- Commitment.

When a defendant is sentenced to pay a fine in addition to a jail or a prison sentence and the judgment is that the jail or prison sentence be suspended upon payment of the fine, the service of the jail or prison sentence shall satisfy the judgment. If a defendant fails to pay the fine and thereafter the court finds that the defendant failed to make a good faith effort to pay the fine, the court may, after a hearing, order the execution of the suspended jail or prison sentence. If a defendant is sentenced to pay a fine only or is sentenced to jail or prison and a fine, with neither suspended, he shall not later be committed to jail for failure to pay the fine.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

